North Dakota, session 69, SB2066.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 12-48-03.1 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. All products made in prison industries may be purchased directly by governmental
agencies, including federal, state, and tribal agencies and political subdivisions, for
use in official business, and by nonprofit organizations, excluding trade associations,
fraternal organizations, co-ops, and health insurance companies. Prison industries
may sell commissary items and prison industries-made clothing to inmates. Prison
industries-made products may also be sold through wholesale or retail outlets that
possess a valid sales tax permit, and if the products are manufactured under the
prison industries enhancement certification program under Public Law No. 96-157 [93
Stat. 1215; 18 U.S.C. 176(c)], in interstate commerce and through export firms for sale
to international markets. Prison industries-made products may be sold to state
employees within the state for personal use.
Page No. 1 25.8053.01000